Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6229.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 12-1.1 of the General Laws entitled "State Crime Laboratory
Commission" is hereby repealed in its entirety.
CHAPTER 12-1.1
State Crime Laboratory Commission
12-1.1-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “State Crime Laboratory
Commission.”
12-1.1-2. Legislative findings and purpose.
The general assembly recognizes and declares that:
(1) Examining crime scenes for evidence is essentially a state and local problem;
(2) The establishment of appropriate goals, objectives, and standards for the examination
of crime scenes and the training of appropriate personnel in such techniques must be a priority
concern;
(3) The functions of a state crime lab must be coordinated in an efficient and effective
manner;
(4) The full and effective use of resources affecting state and local crime scene
investigations requires the complete cooperation of state and local law enforcement agencies; and
(5) Training, research, evaluation, and technical assistance activities must be encouraged

and focused on the improvement of scientific criminal investigation in Rhode Island.
12-1.1-3. Creation.
There is established the state laboratories for scientific criminal investigation commission,
called throughout this chapter the state crime laboratory commission.
12-1.1-4. Membership.
(a) The commission shall consist of five (5) members: the attorney general; the
superintendent of state police; and a representative of the Rhode Island Police Chiefs Association
appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate; and two (2) public members
appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Appointed public members
shall serve two (2) year terms and shall be eligible to succeed themselves.
(b) Members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. Each member
of the board may designate a subordinate within his or her department or agency to represent him
or her at all meetings of the board. Three (3) members of the board shall constitute a quorum and
the vote of a majority of those present and voting shall be required for action.
(c) Members of the commission shall be removable by the governor pursuant to the
provisions of § 36-1-7 of the general laws and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or
personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.
12-1.1-5. Chairperson.
The attorney general shall be the chairperson of the commission. The board may elect from
among its members such other officers as it deems necessary.
12-1.1-6. Executive secretary.
The dean of the College of Pharmacy at the University of Rhode Island shall serve as the
executive secretary of the commission. The executive secretary shall oversee the administration of
the state crime laboratory, including all budgetary and personnel matters, and shall provide timely
reports to the commission regarding all matters pertaining to the state crime laboratory.
12-1.1-7. Meetings.
The commission shall meet at the call of its chairperson and at least four (4) times each
year, the time and place for the meetings to be fixed by the chairperson.
12-1.1-8. Powers and duties of commission.
The commission shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) Establish goals, priorities, standards, policies, plans, programs, and budgets for the
operation of the state crime laboratory;
(2) Monitor the general operation of the state crime laboratory and evaluate its
effectiveness;
LC002635 - Page 2 of 36

(3) Apply for, contract for, receive, and expend for its purposes any appropriations or grants
from the state and/or its political subdivisions, the federal government, or any other source, public
or private, in accordance with the appropriations process;
(4)(i) Accept funds appropriated by the general assembly out of any money in the treasury
not otherwise appropriated for effectuating the daily operation of the state crime laboratory;
(ii) Accept any moneys made available through direct grants for its function and operation;
(iii) Expend these sums of money for the purchase of equipment, payment of salaries,
purchase of material, office supplies, and laboratory supplies, and for labor for publishing, for the
benefit of law enforcement officers in the state of Rhode Island, for scientific advances in the field
of criminalistics, and any other essentials that may be deemed necessary and expedient to the
scientific criminal investigation and training of law enforcement officers and firefighters in modern
scientific investigative techniques and research in the field of scientific criminal investigation;
(5) Recommend legislation to the governor and legislature in the field of scientific criminal
investigation;
(6) Provide suitable badges and appropriate commissions to laboratory personnel in
evidence of their authority;
(7) Establish any and all committees it deems necessary to carry out the mission of the state
crime laboratory;
(8) Perform any other duties that may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter
and chapter 1.2.
(9) Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, the commission shall approve
and submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the
president of the senate, and the secretary of state, of its activities during that fiscal year. The report
shall provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, including meeting
minutes, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, rules or regulations promulgated, studies
conducted, policies and plans developed, approved, or modified, and programs administered or
initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and expended including the source
of the funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, and a summary of any clerical,
administrative or technical support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal
year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a synopsis of hearings, complaints,
suspensions, or other legal matters related to the commission; a summary of any training courses
held pursuant to this chapter; a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year; and
findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be posted electronically on the
websites of the general assembly and the secretary of state pursuant to the provisions of § 42-20-
LC002635 - Page 3 of 36

8.2. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of
the provisions of this subsection;
(10) To approve or disapprove the director and all other positions of the state crime
laboratory appointed by the University of Rhode Island.
(11) To conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified members within six
(6) months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the chair of the
commission, be approved by the commission, and be conducted by the chair of the commission.
The commission may approve the use of any commission and/or staff members and/or individuals
to assist with training. The training course shall include instruction in the following areas: the
provisions of chapters 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2; and the commission’s rules and regulations. The
director of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of
this act [June 7, 2006], prepare and disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of
chapters 42-46, 36-14, and 38-2.
12-1.1-9. Repealed.
12-1.1-10. Cooperation of departments — Using facilities of the University of Rhode
Island.
All other departments, agencies, and bodies of state government are authorized and
directed to cooperate with and furnish any information that the commission shall require. The
commission is directed in carrying out the provisions and purposes of this chapter and chapter 1.2
to confer with the University of Rhode Island as to the continued utilization of facilities, scientific
equipment, and personnel available.
12-1.1-11. Termination or modification of commission — Report to governor.
(a) For good cause, the commission, with the approval of the governor, shall determine a
termination or modification date, and, upon that determination, the commission shall submit a
report to the governor that will outline a plan for the orderly termination or modification of the
commission.
(b)(1) The report will be submitted at least four (4) months prior to the termination or
modification date and will include, but not be limited to, a review of the performance and
effectiveness of the commission.
(2) The report will include a recommendation that the purpose of this chapter or chapter
1.2 be reviewed or amended, that the commission be reorganized, or that this chapter or chapter 1.2
be repealed.
SECTION 2. Chapter 12-1.2 of the General Laws entitled "State Crime Laboratory" is
hereby repealed in its entirety.
LC002635 - Page 4 of 36

CHAPTER 12-1.2
State Crime Laboratory
12-1.2-1. Creation.
There shall be a state crime laboratory located at the University of Rhode Island.
12-1.2-2. Jurisdiction.
The state crime laboratory shall have the authority to investigate any and all evidence
relating to state or local crimes when requested by appropriate agencies.
12-1.2-3. Functions of the state crime laboratory.
The state crime laboratory shall be responsible for:
(1) Technical services.
(i) To examine and evaluate physical evidence collected at the scene of a crime or related
to a crime. The examinations will be conducted in areas such as forensic serology, firearms,
analyses of accelerants, explosives, scientific methodology in microscopy, including fiber, hair,
blood, and plant microscopy, spectroscopy, ion emission, glass examination, tool impressions,
fingerprint techniques, tire impressions, and other similar technology;
(ii) To examine evidence upon submission by state and local fire departments and law
enforcement agencies;
(iii) To assure the safe custody of that evidence;
(iv) To submit written reports of the results of examinations of evidence to the agency;
(v) To request the services of qualified consultants when deemed necessary;
(vi) To render expert court testimony when requested;
(vii) To assist in the processing of a crime scene upon request to the director. Transportation
as needed for this function should be provided by the agency requesting assistance.
(2) Training.
(i) To offer a training course in scientific criminal investigation each year to all
enforcement divisions both state and local;
(ii) To offer refresher or in-service courses in specialty areas of scientific criminal
investigation;
(iii) To conduct training dealing with police science, when requested, for each of the Rhode
Island State Municipal Police Training Academy classes, the Providence Police Academy classes,
and the Rhode Island State Police Academy classes.
(3) Research. To conduct ongoing research in areas of the forensic sciences.
12-1.2-4. Funding.
The state crime laboratory shall be funded through the budget of the University of Rhode
LC002635 - Page 5 of 36

Island.
12-1.2-5. Director of state crime laboratory — Term.
(a) The crime laboratory shall be under the immediate supervision of a director, who shall
be known as the “director — state crime laboratory” and who shall possess a Ph.D. degree or an
equivalent combination of a M.S. degree and experience in an appropriate field and who has had
forensic training or experience.
(b) The director shall serve for a period of five (5) years and may be reappointed by the
commission thereafter to subsequent five (5) year terms.
12-1.2-6. Candidates for director and other positions — Selection — Appointment —
Dismissals.
(a) Candidates for the position of director and all other positions of the crime laboratory
may be recommended to the commission by the executive secretary and/or other members of the
commission as well as from all other sources.
(b) The director and all other positions of the state crime laboratory shall be considered
employees of the council on postsecondary education and shall be subject to all employment
policies, practices, and procedures of the council on postsecondary education and the University of
Rhode Island.
(c) The appointive authority for the University of Rhode Island shall also be the appointing
authority for the position of director and all other positions of the state crime laboratory subject to
approval or disapproval by the commission.
12-1.2-7. Powers and duties of director.
(a) The director shall have general supervision over the administration of and shall enforce
the provisions of this chapter. He or she shall recommend to the commission any rules and
regulations that he or she may deem necessary to effectuate the provisions of this chapter and shall
be responsible for the administration of the policies established by the commission.
(b) The director shall be responsible for preparing an annual operating budget and
submitting it to the dean of the College of Pharmacy at the University of Rhode Island, who will in
turn submit it to the commission.
(c) The director shall collect, develop, and maintain statistical information, records, and
reports as the executive secretary or as the commission may determine relevant to its functions and
transmit quarterly to the executive secretary or the commission a report of the operations of the
state crime laboratory for the preceding quarter.
(d) The director shall exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper in
carrying out his or her responsibilities that may be directed by the executive secretary or the
LC002635 - Page 6 of 36

commission.
(e) The director shall timely provide records, reports or other information pertaining to the
operation of the crime laboratory whenever requested by the executive secretary or the commission.
12-1.2-8 — 12-1.2-14. [Transferred.]
SECTION 3. Section 23-1-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-1 entitled "Department of
Health" is hereby repealed.
23-1-8. Forensic scientist — Crime detection.
The director of health shall appoint in accordance with law a suitable and qualified forensic
scientist to conduct examinations of evidence in connection with scientific crime detection, and for
that purpose the director shall cooperate with the Rhode Island state police, the department of the
attorney general, and other law enforcement agencies in the matter of scientific crime detection.
SECTION 4. Chapter 42-9 of the General Laws entitled "Department of Attorney General"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-9-20. Rhode Island state crime laboratory.
(a) Establishment.
(1) There is hereby established within the department of attorney general a Rhode Island
state crime laboratory. The head of the laboratory shall be the director of the Rhode Island state
crime laboratory, and shall be appointed by the attorney general and shall serve at the pleasure of
the attorney general.
(2) Whenever, in any general law, public law, or regulation, the words “state crime
laboratory,” “state crime lab,” or “crime lab” shall appear, the same shall be deemed to refer to and
mean the “Rhode Island state crime laboratory.” Whenever, in any general law, public law or
regulation the words “state crime laboratory commission” shall appear, the same shall be deemed
to refer to and mean the “director of the Rhode Island state crime laboratory”.
(b) Director and staff – Qualifications – Powers and duties.
(1) The state crime laboratory shall consist of a director, forensic scientists, and support
personnel, all of whom shall be appointed by the attorney general and shall serve at the pleasure of
the attorney general.
(2) The state crime laboratory shall be under the immediate supervision of a director, who
shall be known as the “director of the Rhode Island state crime laboratory” and who shall possess
a Ph.D. degree or an equivalent combination of a M.S. degree and experience in an appropriate
field and who has had forensic training or experience.
(i) The director shall have the powers and duties necessary to effectuate the implementation
and supervision of the state crime laboratory including, but not limited to:
LC002635 - Page 7 of 36

(A) Establishing goals, priorities, standards, policies, staff qualifications, and programs for
the operation of the state crime laboratory;
(B) Monitoring the general operation of the state crime laboratory and evaluating its
effectiveness;
(C) Applying for, contracting for, receiving, and expending for its purposes any
appropriations or grants from the state and/or its political subdivisions, the federal government, or
any other source, public or private, in accordance with the appropriations process;
(D) Institute training programs for law enforcement officers and firefighters in modern
scientific investigative techniques and research in the field of scientific criminal investigation
including, but not limited to:
(I) A training course in scientific criminal investigation each year to all enforcement
divisions both state and local;
(II) A refresher or in-service courses in specialty areas of scientific criminal investigation;
(III) Training dealing with police science, when requested, for each of the Rhode Island
State municipal police training academy classes, the Providence police academy classes, and the
Rhode Island state police academy classes.
(E) Mandate training and continuing education for members of the state crime laboratory.
(F) Collect, develop, and maintain statistical information, records, and reports as the
director may determine relevant to its functions and transmit annually to the general assembly a
report of the operations of the state crime laboratory for the preceding year;
(G) Exercise all powers and perform any and all duties necessary to carry out their
responsibilities as may be directed by the attorney general.
(3) The director shall have general supervision over the administration of the state crime
laboratory and shall enforce the provisions of this section.
(c) Jurisdiction.
(1) The Rhode Island state crime laboratory shall have the authority to investigate any and
all evidence relating to federal, state or local crimes when requested by appropriate agencies.
(2) All other departments, agencies, and bodies of state government are authorized and
directed to cooperate with and furnish any information that the laboratory shall require.
(d) Functions. The state crime laboratory shall be responsible for:
(1) Technical services.
(i) Examine and evaluate physical evidence collected at the scene of a crime or related to
a crime. The examinations will be conducted in areas including, but not limited to, forensic
serology, firearms, analyses of accelerants, explosives, scientific methodology in microscopy,
LC002635 - Page 8 of 36

including fiber, hair, blood, and plant microscopy, spectroscopy, ion emission, glass examination,
tool impressions, fingerprint techniques, tire impressions, controlled substances identification and
testing, forensic biology, impaired driving testing, DNA/CODIS testing, and other similar
technology;
(ii) Examine evidence upon submission by state and local fire departments and law
enforcement agencies;
(iii) Assure the safe custody of that evidence;
(iv) Submit written reports of the results of examinations of evidence to the agency;
(v) Request the services of qualified consultants when deemed necessary;
(vi) Render expert court testimony when requested;
(vii) Assist in the processing of a crime scene upon request to the director. Transportation
as needed for this function should be provided by the agency requesting assistance.
(2) DNA.
(i) Conduct examinations of evidence in connection with scientific crime detection, and for
that purpose the director shall cooperate with the Rhode Island state police, and other law
enforcement agencies, in the matter of scientific crime detection;
(ii) Carry out the duties and functions set forth in chapter 1.5 of title 12.
(3) Research. Conduct ongoing research in area of the forensic sciences.
(f) Standards. The state crime laboratory shall adopt and implement such standards as may
be applicable to its scope and purpose and as necessary to comply with its accreditation standards
by its accrediting agencies institutions.
(g) Rules and regulations. The attorney general may promulgate any rules and regulations
that they deem necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section and shall be responsible for the
administration of the policies established by the state crime laboratory or the attorney general.
(h) Severability. If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or
circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the
section, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the
provisions of this section are declared to be severable.
SECTION 5. Sections 12-1.5-2, 12-1.5-3, 12-1.5-4, 12-1.5-5, 12-1.5-8, 12-1.5-10, 12-1.5-
11, 12-1.5-12, 12-1.5-13, 12-1.5-16 and 12-1.5-19 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-1.5 entitled
"DNA Detection of Sexual and Violent Offenders" are hereby amended to read as follows:
12-1.5-2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) “CODIS” is derived from combined DNA index system, the Federal Bureau of
LC002635 - Page 9 of 36

Investigation’s national DNA identification index system that allows the storage and exchange of
DNA records submitted by state and local forensic DNA laboratories;
(2) “DNA” means deooxyribonucleic acid, which is located in the cells of the body and
provides an individual’s personal genetic blueprint. DNA encodes genetic information that is the
basis of human hereditary and forensic identification;
(3) “DNA record” means DNA identification information only, which is stored in the state
DNA database or the combined DNA index system for the purpose of generating investigative leads
or supporting statistical interpretation of DNA test results. The DNA record is the result obtained
from the DNA typing tests. The DNA record is comprised of the characteristics of a DNA sample
that are of value only in establishing the identity of individuals. The DNA record, however, does
not include the DNA sample, and the DNA record may never include the results of tests of any
structural genes. The results of all DNA identification tests on an individual’s DNA sample are also
collectively referred to as the DNA profile of an individual;
(4) “DNA sample” means a blood or tissue sample provided by any person with respect to
offenses covered by this chapter, or submitted to the department of health Rhode Island state crime
laboratory pursuant to this chapter for DNA analysis or storage, or both;
(5) “F.B.I.” means the Federal Bureau of Investigation;
(6) “State DNA databank” means the repository of DNA samples collected under this
chapter, that is administered by the department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory; and
(7) “State DNA database” means the state-level DNA identification record system to
support law enforcement that is administered by the department of health Rhode Island state crime
laboratory and that provides DNA records to the F.B.I. for storage and maintenance in CODIS. It
is the collective capability to store and maintain DNA records related to forensic casework, the
DNA records of those arrested for crimes of violence as defined in § 12-1.5-2 and/or convicted
offenders required to provide a DNA sample under state law, and anonymous DNA records used
for research, quality control, and other DNA analysis support systems.
(8) “Crimes of violence” include murder, manslaughter, first-degree arson, kidnapping
with intent to extort, robbery, larceny from the person, first-degree sexual assault, second-degree
sexual assault, first-and-second degree child molestation, assault with intent to murder, assault with
intent to rob, assault with intent to commit first-degree sexual assault, burglary, and entering a
dwelling house with intent to commit murder, robbery, sexual assault, or larceny.
12-1.5-3. Powers and duties of the department of health Powers and duties of the
Rhode Island state crime laboratory.
In addition to any other powers and duties conferred by this chapter, the department of
LC002635 - Page 10 of 36

health Rhode Island state crime laboratory shall:
(1) Be responsible for the policy management and administration of the state DNA database
and state DNA databank;
(2) Promulgate rules and regulations, within one hundred and eighty (180) days of June 29,
1998, to carry out the provisions of this chapter; and
(3) Provide for liaison with the F.B.I. and other criminal justice agencies in regard to the
state’s participation in CODIS or in any DNA database designated by the department of health
Rhode Island state crime laboratory.
12-1.5-4. State DNA database.
There is established the state DNA database. It shall be administered by the department of
health Rhode Island state crime laboratory and provide DNA records for the F.B.I. for storage and
maintenance by CODIS. The state DNA database shall have the capability provided by computer
software and procedures administered by the department of health Rhode Island state crime
laboratory to store and maintain DNA records related to:
(1) Forensic casework, including the identification of missing persons;
(2) Individuals arrested for any crime of violence as defined in § 12-1.5-2 and convicted
felony offenders required to provide a DNA sample under this chapter; and
(3) Anonymous DNA records used for research on identification technologies or quality
control.
12-1.5-5. State DNA databank.
There is established the state DNA databank. It shall serve as the repository of DNA
samples collected under this chapter and shall be administered by the department of health Rhode
Island state crime laboratory.
12-1.5-8. DNA sample required upon arrest or conviction for any crime of violence.
(a) Every person arrested for a crime of violence as defined in § 12-1.5-2, who pleads guilty
or nolo contendere, or is convicted of any felony shall have a DNA sample taken for analysis as
follows:
(1) Every person who is sentenced to a term of confinement to prison, for any crime of
violence as defined in § 12-1.5-2, or any felony shall not be released prior to the expiration of his
or her maximum term of confinement unless and until a DNA sample has been taken;
(2) Every person convicted of any crime of violence as defined in § 12-1.5-2, or any felony,
or who is sentenced thereon to any term of probation, or upon whose case sentencing is deferred
shall have a DNA sample taken for analysis by the department of health Rhode Island state crime
laboratory as a condition of any sentence which disposition will not involve an intake into prison.
LC002635 - Page 11 of 36

(b) Every person arrested for any crime of violence as defined in § 12-1.5-2 shall, at the
time of booking, have a DNA sample taken for analysis and included in the Rhode Island DNA
database and DNA databank respectively as required by this chapter and every such person shall
be notified of his or her expungement rights under § 12-1.5-13 at or near the time the DNA sample
is taken.
(1) The DNA sample shall be submitted by the arresting authority to the department of
health Rhode Island state crime laboratory. The department of health Rhode Island state crime
laboratory shall not test or place the sample in the statewide DNA database prior to arraignment
unless one of the following conditions has been met:
(i) The arrestee appeared before any judicial officer for an arraignment and the judicial
officer made a finding that there was probable cause for the arrest; or
(ii) The defendant was released and then failed to appear for the initial hearing, or escaped
custody prior to appearing before a judicial officer.
(2) If all qualifying criminal charges are determined to be unsupported by probable cause:
(i) The DNA sample shall be immediately destroyed; and
(ii) Notice shall be sent by the prosecuting authority to the defendant and counsel of record
for the defendant that the sample was destroyed.
(3) The arrestee requests or consents to having their DNA sample processed prior to
arraignment for the sole purpose of having the sample checked against a sample that has been
processed from the crime scene or the hospital, and is related to the charges against the person.
(4) A second DNA sample shall be taken if needed to obtain sufficient DNA for the
statewide DNA database system or if ordered by the court for good cause shown.
(c) All DNA samples taken pursuant to this section shall be taken in accordance with
regulations promulgated by the department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory.
(d) The director of the department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory shall
promulgate rules and regulations governing the periodic review of the DNA identification database
to determine whether or not the database contains DNA profiles that should not be in the database,
including the steps necessary to expunge any profiles that the department Rhode Island state crime
laboratory determines should not be in the database.
(e) The requirements of this chapter are mandatory. In the event that an arrestee’s DNA
sample is not adequate for any reason, the arrestee shall provide another DNA sample for analysis.
(f) A sample does not need to be collected if the person has previously provided a sample
sufficient for DNA testing pursuant to the provisions of this section.
12-1.5-10. Procedures for conduct, disposition and use of DNA analysis.
LC002635 - Page 12 of 36

The department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory shall promulgate procedures
to be used in the collection, submission, identification, analysis, storage and disposition of DNA
samples and typing results of DNA samples submitted under this chapter. These procedures shall
meet or exceed the current standards for quality assurance and proficiency testing for DNA analysis
issued by the F.B.I. All DNA sample typing results, all DNA records and all DNA samples shall
be securely stored in the state of Rhode Island DNA database and DNA databank respectively, in
the following manner:
(1) All DNA sample typing results and the DNA records shall be stored in a computer
database after all personal identifiers have been removed. Further, these records shall be accessed
only through the use of an encryption code. The encryption code shall be confidential and only
those persons authorized by the department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory and
charged with responsibilities under this chapter shall have access to these records and shall be given
the encryption code.
(2) All DNA samples shall be securely locked, with a coded locking system, in a DNA
databank at the department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory and only the director of
the department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory and the head of the DNA laboratory
necessary personnel shall have access to these DNA samples to carry out the provisions of this
chapter.
(3) The department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory is authorized to contract
with third parties for purposes of creating a DNA record only. Any third party contracting to carry
out the functions of this chapter shall be subject to the same restrictions and requirements of this
chapter, and DNA samples provided to third parties pursuant to this section shall have all personal
identification removed.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in § 12-1.5-11, DNA samples and DNA records collected
under this chapter shall be used only for law enforcement identification purposes or to assist in the
recovery of identification of human remains from disasters or for other humanitarian identification
purposes, including identification of missing persons; and
(5) DNA samples and DNA records collected under this chapter shall never be used under
the provisions of this chapter for the purpose of obtaining information about physical
characteristics, traits or predispositions for disease.
12-1.5-11. DNA database exchange.
It shall be the duty of the department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory to collect
DNA samples, to receive, store, and to perform analysis or to contract for DNA typing analysis
with a qualified DNA laboratory that meets the regulations as established by the department of
LC002635 - Page 13 of 36

health Rhode Island state crime laboratory, to classify and to file the DNA record of identification
characteristic profiles of DNA samples submitted under this chapter and to make the information
available as provided in this section. Access to the DNA databank shall be for identification
analysis only and shall be limited upon a showing of need to duly constituted federal, state and
local law enforcement agencies and their servicing forensic DNA laboratories and by court order
to the defendant or his or her attorney in a criminal case. The contents of the DNA record of
individuals in the state DNA database shall be made available:
(1) To criminal justice agencies or approved DNA forensic laboratories which serve these
agencies; or
(2) Upon written or electronic request and in furtherance of an official investigation by a
criminal justice agency or its designated forensic laboratory of a criminal offense or offender or
suspected offender;
(3) To prosecuting attorneys who are actively involved in a case in which the DNA record
of an individual is relevant; to grand juries and courts when such records are subpoenaed; to defense
attorneys when the DNA record is relevant to a pending case.
(4) The department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory shall consistent with the
provisions of this chapter promulgate regulations governing the methods of obtaining information
from the state DNA database and CODIS and procedures for verification of the identity and
authority of the requester; and
(5) The department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory may create a separate
population database comprised of DNA samples obtained under this chapter after all personal
identification is removed. The department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory may share
or disseminate the population database with other criminal justice agencies or forensic DNA
laboratories that serve to assist the department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory with
statistical databases. The population database may be made available to and searched by other
agencies participating in the CODIS system.
12-1.5-12. Cancellation of authority to access or exchange DNA records.
The department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory shall be authorized, for good
cause shown, to revoke or suspend the right of a forensic DNA laboratory within this state to access
or exchange DNA identification records with criminal justice agencies.
12-1.5-13. Expungement.
(a) A person whose DNA record or profile has been included in the databank pursuant to
this act may request expungement on the grounds that the conviction on which authority for
including that person’s DNA record or profile was based has been reversed. The department of
LC002635 - Page 14 of 36

health Rhode Island state crime laboratory shall purge all records and identifiable information in
the database pertaining to the person and destroy all samples from the person upon receipt of a
written request for expungement pursuant to this section and a certified copy of the final court order
reversing the conviction. The department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory shall purge
and destroy all records and identifiable information in its database and all DNA samples taken
pursuant to this chapter from convicted persons upon official proof that the person has been
deceased for a period of at least three (3) years. Official proof shall include, but not be limited to,
a certified copy of a death certificate.
(b) If the offense for which a DNA sample has been taken pursuant to § 12-1.5-8(b) does
not result in a charge through information or indictment; or leads to voluntary dismissal of the
charge by the state, or dismissal by a court; or by a not guilty verdict after trial; or upon the vacating
or the reversal of a conviction in which the state does not retry the defendant or appeal the decision;
or loses such appeal upon hearing; or upon any plea or conviction of a lesser offense that would
not give rise to the mandatory sampling of the individual’s DNA; the record or profile shall be
expunged from the state DNA identification database, regardless of any prior record for which
DNA sampling would not have been authorized, except pursuant to subsection (e) herein.
(1) The prosecuting authority shall, within thirty (30) days of an event listed in this
subsection, notify the department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory of such event for
purposes of expunging the person’s DNA record and any samples, analyses, or other documents
relating to the DNA testing of such individual in connection with the investigation, arrest, and/or
prosecution of the crime that resulted in the arrest of the person. The department Rhode Island state
crime laboratory shall, within thirty (30) days of receiving such notification, destroy and expunge
the person’s DNA record and any samples, analyses, or other documents relating to the DNA testing
of such individual and shall notify the individual of such action.
(c) Upon receipt of a written request for expungement from the person whose DNA record
or profile has been included in the database pursuant to this chapter and notification of the
completion of a program of diversion or the completion of the term of a sentence of deferment, or
of the granting of a pardon, the record or profile shall be expunged from the state DNA
identification database, regardless of any prior record for which DNA sampling would not have
been authorized, except pursuant to subsection (e) herein, and such individual may apply to the
court for an order directing the expungement of their DNA record and any samples, analyses, or
other documents relating to the DNA testing of such individual in connection with the investigation,
arrest, and/or prosecution of the crime that resulted in the arrest of the person.
(d) A copy of the expungement motion shall be served on the attorney general and the
LC002635 - Page 15 of 36

arresting police department with ten (10) days’ notice prior to hearing, and an order directing
expungement shall be granted if the court finds any of the appropriate conditions of the prior
subsection are satisfied.
(e) The department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory shall, by rule or
regulation, prescribe procedures to ensure that the DNA record in the state DNA identification
database, and any samples, analyses, or other documents relating to such record, whether in the
possession of the division, or any law enforcement or police agency, or any forensic DNA
laboratory, including any duplicates or copies thereof are destroyed, including any records from
CODIS. The director of health the Rhode Island state crime laboratory shall also adopt, by rule and
regulation, a procedure for the expungement in other appropriate circumstances of DNA records
contained in the database.
(f) No expungement shall be granted where an individual has a prior conviction requiring
a DNA sample, or a pending charge for which collection of a sample was authorized pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter.
(g) The detention, arrest, or conviction of a person based upon a database match or database
information is not invalidated if it is determined that the sample was obtained or placed in the
database by mistake. Any identification, warrant, or probable cause to arrest based upon a database
match is not invalidated due to a failure to expunge or a delay in expunging records.
(h) At the time of collection of the DNA sample upon arrest of any crime of violence as
defined in § 12-1.5-2, the individual from whom a sample is collected shall be given written notice
that the DNA record may be expunged and the DNA sample destroyed in accordance with this
section. In addition, the department of health, the office of the attorney general, and the office of
the public defender shall post on their websites the expungement provisions of this section.
12-1.5-16. Confidentiality of records.
All DNA profiles and samples submitted to the department of health Rhode Island state
crime laboratory pursuant to this chapter shall be treated as confidential and exempt from the
provisions of chapter 2 of title 38 except as otherwise provided in this chapter.
12-1.5-19. DNA offender audit.
(a) The crime laboratory pursuant to chapter 1.2 of this title § 42-9-20 shall conduct an
audit of offender DNA profiles included on the state DNA databank pursuant to this chapter in
order to identify the number of DNA profiles that are missing from the databank which should have
been collected pursuant to this chapter. The crime laboratory shall support this effort as necessary
to comply with report deadlines.
(b) The audit shall initiate with offender DNA samples that were required to be collected
LC002635 - Page 16 of 36

under this chapter, and shall include all samples required pursuant to § 12-1.5-7.
(c) A preliminary report including the overall number of estimated owed DNA samples
shall be reported to the general assembly promptly upon completion of the initial audit, due to the
significant risk to public safety of any failed collections. The preliminary report shall be provided
by January 1, 2024.
(d) A final report to further include additional details on types of offenses for which DNA
samples are owed, and an overview of where collection failures occurred shall be submitted no
later than December 31, 2024. Thereafter, an annual audit shall be completed and reported to the
general assembly no later than December 31 of each year.
SECTION 6. Section 12-5-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-5 entitled "Search
Warrants" is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-5-2. Grounds for issuance.
A warrant may be issued under this chapter to search for and seize any of the following:
(1) Property stolen or embezzled, or obtained by any false pretense, or pretenses, with
intent to cheat or defraud within this state, or elsewhere;
(2) Property kept, suffered to be kept, concealed, deposited, or possessed in violation of
law, or for the purpose of violating the law;
(3) Property designed or intended for use, or that is or has been used, in violation of law,
or as a means of committing a violation of law;
(4) Property that is evidence of the commission of a crime;
(5) Samples of blood, saliva, hair, bodily tissues, bodily fluids, or dental impressions from
the body of a person that may yield evidence of the identity of the perpetrator of a crime when
subjected to scientific or other forensic analysis. The foregoing samples, and the results of any
scientific or other forensic analysis, shall be admissible in all criminal proceedings, subject to
application of the rules of evidence and criminal procedure. When any of the foregoing samples
are seized for scientific or forensic analysis, the seizure shall be conducted in accordance with the
regulations, guidelines, or protocols of the department of health or the state crime laboratory, as
may be appropriate under the circumstances;
(6) Samples of blood or breath that may yield evidence of the presence of alcohol or a
controlled substance when subjected to a chemical test, as contemplated in § 31-27-2. When any
of the foregoing samples are seized for purposes of performing the aforementioned chemical test,
the seizure shall be conducted in accordance with the regulations of the department of health Rhode
Island state crime laboratory that apply to the consensual collection of such a sample for purposes
of the chemical test contemplated by § 31-27-2; or
LC002635 - Page 17 of 36

(7) Property of a respondent under chapter 8.3 of title 8 where firearms may be under the
possession, custody, or control of the respondent.
SECTION 7. Sections 31-27-2, 31-27-2.1, 31-27-2.3, 31-27-2.5 and 31-27-2.9 of the
General Laws in Chapter 31-27 entitled "Motor Vehicle Offenses" are hereby amended to read as
follows:
31-27-2. Driving under influence of liquor or drugs. [Effective July 1, 2025.]
(a) Whoever drives or otherwise operates any vehicle in the state while under the influence
of any intoxicating liquor, drugs, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of
title 21, or any combination of these, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, except as provided in
subsection (d)(3), and shall be punished as provided in subsection (d) of this section.
(b)(1) Any person charged under subsection (a), whose blood alcohol concentration is eight
one-hundredths of one percent (.08%) or more by weight, as shown by a chemical analysis of a
blood, breath, or urine sample, shall be guilty of violating subsection (a). This provision shall not
preclude a conviction based on other admissible evidence, including the testimony of a drug
recognition expert or evaluator, certified pursuant to training approved by the Rhode Island
department of transportation office on highway safety. Proof of guilt under this section may also
be based on evidence that the person charged was under the influence of intoxicating liquor, drugs,
toluene, or any controlled substance defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination of these,
to a degree that rendered the person incapable of safely operating a vehicle. The fact that any person
charged with violating this section is, or has been, legally entitled to use alcohol or a drug shall not
constitute a defense against any charge of violating this section.
(2) [Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 170, § 1 and P.L. 2021, ch. 171, § 1.]
(c) In any criminal prosecution for a violation of subsection (a), evidence as to the amount
of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or
any combination of these, in the defendant’s blood at the time alleged as shown by a chemical
analysis of the defendant’s breath, blood, saliva or urine or other bodily substance, shall be
admissible and competent, provided that evidence is presented that the following conditions have
been complied with:
(1) The defendant has consented to the taking of the test upon which the analysis is made.
Evidence that the defendant had refused to submit to the test shall not be admissible unless the
defendant elects to testify.
(2) A true copy of the report of the test result was hand delivered at the location of the test
or mailed within seventy-two (72) hours of the taking of the test to the person submitting to a breath
test.
LC002635 - Page 18 of 36

(3) Any person submitting to a chemical test of blood, urine, saliva or other body fluids
shall have a true copy of the report of the test result mailed to him or her within thirty (30) days
following the taking of the test.
(4) The test was performed according to methods and with equipment approved by the
director of the department of health of the state of Rhode Island state crime laboratory and by an
authorized individual.
(5) Equipment used for the conduct of the tests by means of breath analysis had been tested
for accuracy within thirty (30) days preceding the test by personnel qualified as hereinbefore
provided, and breathalyzer operators shall be qualified and certified by the department of health
Rhode Island state crime laboratory within three hundred sixty-five (365) days of the test.
(6) The person arrested and charged with operating a motor vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of
title 21 or any combination of these in violation of subsection (a), was afforded the opportunity to
have an additional chemical test. The officer arresting or so charging the person shall have informed
the person of this right and afforded him or her a reasonable opportunity to exercise this right, and
a notation to this effect is made in the official records of the case in the police department. Refusal
to permit an additional chemical test shall render incompetent and inadmissible in evidence the
original report.
(d)(1)(i) Every person found to have violated subsection (b)(1) shall be sentenced as
follows: for a first violation whose blood alcohol concentration is eight one-hundredths of one
percent (.08%), but less than one-tenth of one percent (.1%), by weight, or who has a blood presence
of any scheduled controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, shall be subject to a fine
of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than three hundred dollars ($300); shall be
required to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of public community restitution, and/or shall be
imprisoned for up to one year. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional
institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge and/or shall be required to attend a special
course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance; provided,
however, that the court may permit a servicemember or veteran to complete any court-approved
counseling program administered or approved by the Veterans’ Administration, and his or her
driver’s license shall be suspended for thirty (30) days up to one hundred eighty (180) days. The
sentencing judge or magistrate may prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle, pursuant
to subsection (d)(9) or (d)(10) of this section, that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system
and/or blood and urine testing as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(ii) Every person convicted of a first violation whose blood alcohol concentration is one-
LC002635 - Page 19 of 36

tenth of one percent (.1%) by weight or above, but less than fifteen hundredths of one percent
(.15%), or whose blood alcohol concentration is unknown, shall be subject to a fine of not less than
one hundred ($100) dollars, nor more than four hundred dollars ($400), and shall be required to
perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of public community restitution and/or shall be imprisoned for
up to one year. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the
discretion of the sentencing judge. The person’s driving license shall be suspended for a period of
three (3) months to twelve (12) months. The sentencing judge shall require attendance at a special
course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance and/or
alcoholic or drug treatment for the individual; provided, however, that the court may permit a
servicemember or veteran to complete any court-approved counseling program administered or
approved by the Veterans’ Administration. The sentencing judge or magistrate may prohibit that
person from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system as
provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(iii) Every person convicted of a first offense whose blood alcohol concentration is fifteen
hundredths of one percent (.15%) or above, or who is under the influence of a drug, toluene, or any
controlled substance as defined in subsection (b)(1), shall be subject to a fine of five hundred dollars
($500) and shall be required to perform twenty (20) to sixty (60) hours of public community
restitution and/or shall be imprisoned for up to one year. The sentence may be served in any unit
of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge. The person’s driving
license shall be suspended for a period of three (3) months to eighteen (18) months. The sentencing
judge shall require attendance at a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence
of a controlled substance and/or alcohol or drug treatment for the individual; provided, however,
that the court may permit a servicemember or veteran to complete any court-approved counseling
program administered or approved by the Veterans’ Administration. The sentencing judge or
magistrate shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle, pursuant to subsection (d)(9)
or (d)(10) of this section, that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and
urine testing as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(2)(i) Every person convicted of a second violation within a ten-year (10) period with a
blood alcohol concentration of eight one-hundredths of one percent (.08%) or above, but less than
fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%), or whose blood alcohol concentration is unknown, or
who has a blood presence of any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, and every
person convicted of a second violation within a ten-year (10) period, regardless of whether the prior
violation and subsequent conviction was a violation and subsequent conviction under this statute
or under the driving under the influence of liquor or drugs statute of any other state, shall be subject
LC002635 - Page 20 of 36

to a mandatory fine of four hundred dollars ($400). The person’s driving license shall be suspended
for a period of one year to two (2) years, and the individual shall be sentenced to not less than ten
(10) days, nor more than one year, in jail. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult
correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge; however, not less than forty-eight
(48) hours of imprisonment shall be served consecutively. The sentencing judge shall require
alcohol or drug treatment for the individual; provided, however, that the court may permit a
servicemember or veteran to complete any court-approved counseling program administered or
approved by the Veterans’ Administration and shall prohibit that person from operating a motor
vehicle, pursuant to subsection (d)(9) or (d)(10) of this section, that is not equipped with an ignition
interlock system and/or blood and urine testing as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(ii) Every person convicted of a second violation within a ten-year (10) period whose blood
alcohol concentration is fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%) or above, by weight as shown by
a chemical analysis of a blood, breath, or urine sample, or who is under the influence of a drug,
toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in subsection (b)(1), shall be subject to mandatory
imprisonment of not less than six (6) months, nor more than one year; a mandatory fine of not less
than one thousand dollars ($1,000); and a mandatory license suspension for a period of two (2)
years from the date of completion of the sentence imposed under this subsection. The sentencing
judge shall require alcohol or drug treatment for the individual; provided, however, that the court
may permit a servicemember or veteran to complete any court approved counseling program
administered or approved by the Veterans’ Administration. The sentencing judge or magistrate
shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle, pursuant to subsection (d)(9) or (d)(10)
of this section, that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing
as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(3)(i) Every person convicted of a third or subsequent violation within a ten-year (10)
period with a blood alcohol concentration of eight one-hundredths of one percent (.08%) or above,
but less than fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%), or whose blood alcohol concentration is
unknown or who has a blood presence of any scheduled controlled substance as defined in chapter
28 of title 21, regardless of whether any prior violation and subsequent conviction was a violation
and subsequent conviction under this statute or under the driving under the influence of liquor or
drugs statute of any other state, shall be guilty of a felony and be subject to a mandatory fine of
four hundred ($400) dollars. The person’s driving license shall be suspended for a period of two
(2) years to three (3) years, and the individual shall be sentenced to not less than one year and not
more than three (3) years in jail. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional
institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge; however, not less than forty-eight (48) hours
LC002635 - Page 21 of 36

of imprisonment shall be served consecutively. The sentencing judge shall require alcohol or drug
treatment for the individual; provided, however, that the court may permit a servicemember or
veteran to complete any court-approved counseling program administered or approved by the
Veterans’ Administration, and shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle, pursuant
to subsection (d)(9) or (d)(10) of this section, that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system
and/or blood and urine testing as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(ii) Every person convicted of a third or subsequent violation within a ten-year (10) period
whose blood alcohol concentration is fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%) above by weight as
shown by a chemical analysis of a blood, breath, or urine sample, or who is under the influence of
a drug, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in subsection (b)(1), shall be subject to
mandatory imprisonment of not less than three (3) years, nor more than five (5) years; a mandatory
fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000);
and a mandatory license suspension for a period of three (3) years from the date of completion of
the sentence imposed under this subsection. The sentencing judge shall require alcohol or drug
treatment for the individual. The sentencing judge or magistrate shall prohibit that person from
operating a motor vehicle, pursuant to subsection (d)(9) or (d)(10) of this section, that is not
equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing as provided in § 31-27-
2.8.
(iii) In addition to the foregoing penalties, every person convicted of a third or subsequent
violation within a ten-year (10) period, regardless of whether any prior violation and subsequent
conviction was a violation and subsequent conviction under this statute or under the driving under
the influence of liquor or drugs statute of any other state, shall be subject, in the discretion of the
sentencing judge, to having the vehicle owned and operated by the violator seized and sold by the
state of Rhode Island, with all funds obtained by the sale to be transferred to the general fund.
(4) Whoever drives or otherwise operates any vehicle in the state while under the influence
of any intoxicating liquor, drugs, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of
title 21, or any combination of these, when his or her license to operate is suspended, revoked, or
cancelled for operating under the influence of a narcotic drug or intoxicating liquor, shall be guilty
of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years and by a fine of not more
than three thousand dollars ($3,000). The court shall require alcohol and/or drug treatment for the
individual; provided, the penalties provided for in this subsection (d)(4) shall not apply to an
individual who has surrendered his or her license and served the court-ordered period of suspension,
but who, for any reason, has not had his or her license reinstated after the period of suspension,
revocation, or suspension has expired; provided, further, the individual shall be subject to the
LC002635 - Page 22 of 36

provisions of subsection (d)(2)(i), (d)(2)(ii), (d)(3)(i), (d)(3)(ii), or (d)(3)(iii) regarding subsequent
offenses, and any other applicable provision of this section.
(5)(i) For purposes of determining the period of license suspension, a prior violation shall
constitute any charge brought and sustained under the provisions of this section or § 31-27-2.1.
(ii) Any person over the age of eighteen (18) who is convicted under this section for
operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, other drugs, or a combination of
these, while a child under the age of thirteen (13) years was present as a passenger in the motor
vehicle when the offense was committed shall be subject to immediate license suspension pending
prosecution. Any person convicted of violating this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for a
first offense and may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not more than one year and a fine
not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000). Any person convicted of a second or subsequent
offense shall be guilty of a felony offense and may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not
more than five (5) years and a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). The sentencing
judge shall also order a license suspension of up to two (2) years, require attendance at a special
course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance, and alcohol
or drug education and/or treatment. The individual may also be required to pay a highway
assessment fee of no more than five hundred dollars ($500) and the assessment shall be deposited
in the general fund.
(6)(i) Any person convicted of a violation under this section shall pay a highway
assessment fine of five hundred dollars ($500) that shall be deposited into the general fund. The
assessment provided for by this subsection shall be collected from a violator before any other fines
authorized by this section.
(ii) Any person convicted of a violation under this section shall be assessed a fee of eighty-
six dollars ($86).
(7)(i) If the person convicted of violating this section is under the age of eighteen (18)
years, for the first violation he or she shall be required to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of
public community restitution and the juvenile’s driving license shall be suspended for a period of
six (6) months, and may be suspended for a period up to eighteen (18) months. The sentencing
judge shall also require attendance at a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the
influence of a controlled substance and alcohol or drug education and/or treatment for the juvenile.
The juvenile may also be required to pay a highway assessment fine of no more than five hundred
dollars ($500) and the assessment imposed shall be deposited into the general fund.
(ii) If the person convicted of violating this section is under the age of eighteen (18) years,
for a second or subsequent violation regardless of whether any prior violation and subsequent
LC002635 - Page 23 of 36

conviction was a violation and subsequent conviction under this statute or under the driving under
the influence of liquor or drugs statute of any other state, he or she shall be subject to a mandatory
suspension of his or her driving license until such time as he or she is twenty-one (21) years of age
and may, in the discretion of the sentencing judge, also be sentenced to the Rhode Island training
school for a period of not more than one year and/or a fine of not more than five hundred dollars
($500).
(8) Any person convicted of a violation under this section may undergo a clinical
assessment at the community college of Rhode Island’s center for workforce and community
education. Should this clinical assessment determine problems of alcohol, drug abuse, or
psychological problems associated with alcoholic or drug abuse, this person shall be referred to an
appropriate facility, licensed or approved by the department of behavioral healthcare,
developmental disabilities and hospitals, for treatment placement, case management, and
monitoring. In the case of a servicemember or veteran, the court may order that the person be
evaluated through the Veterans’ Administration. Should the clinical assessment determine
problems of alcohol, drug abuse, or psychological problems associated with alcohol or drug abuse,
the person may have their treatment, case management, and monitoring administered or approved
by the Veterans’ Administration.
(9) Notwithstanding any other sentencing and disposition provisions contained in this
chapter, if the judge or magistrate makes a finding beyond a reasonable doubt that a motorist was
operating a vehicle in the state while under the influence of drugs, toluene, or any controlled
substance as evidenced by the presence of controlled substances on or about the person or vehicle,
or other reliable indicia or articulable conditions thereof, but not intoxicating liquor based on a
preliminary breath test, results from a breathalyzer that indicates no blood alcohol concentration,
or both, the judge or magistrate may exercise his or her discretion and eliminate the requirement of
an ignition interlock system; provided, that blood and/or urine testing is mandated as a condition
to operating a motor vehicle as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(10) Notwithstanding any other sentencing and disposition provisions contained in this
chapter, if the judge or magistrate makes a finding beyond a reasonable doubt that a motorist was
operating a vehicle in the state while under the influence of drugs, toluene, or any controlled
substance as evidenced by the presence of controlled substances on or about the person or vehicle,
or other reliable indicia or articulable conditions thereof and intoxicating liquor based on a
preliminary breath test, results from a breathalyzer that indicates blood alcohol concentration, or
both, the judge or magistrate may require an ignition interlock system in addition to blood and/or
urine testing as a condition to operating a motor vehicle as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
LC002635 - Page 24 of 36

(e) Percent by weight of alcohol in the blood shall be based upon milligrams of alcohol per
one hundred cubic centimeters (100 cc) of blood.
(f)(1) There is established an alcohol and drug safety unit within the division of motor
vehicles to administer an alcohol safety action program. The program shall provide for placement
and follow-up for persons who are required to pay the highway safety assessment. The alcohol and
drug safety action program will be administered in conjunction with alcohol and drug programs
licensed by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.
(2) Persons convicted under the provisions of this chapter shall be required to attend a
special course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance, and/or
participate in an alcohol or drug treatment program, which course and programs must meet the
standards established by the Rhode Island department of behavioral healthcare, developmental
disabilities and hospitals; provided, however, that the court may permit a servicemember or veteran
to complete any court-approved counseling program administered or approved by the Veterans’
Administration. The course shall take into consideration any language barrier that may exist as to
any person ordered to attend, and shall provide for instruction reasonably calculated to
communicate the purposes of the course in accordance with the requirements of the subsection.
Any costs reasonably incurred in connection with the provision of this accommodation shall be
borne by the person being retrained. A copy of any violation under this section shall be forwarded
by the court to the alcohol and drug safety unit. In the event that persons convicted under the
provisions of this chapter fail to attend and complete the above course or treatment program, as
ordered by the judge, then the person may be brought before the court, and after a hearing as to
why the order of the court was not followed, may be sentenced to jail for a period not exceeding
one year.
(3) The alcohol and drug safety action program within the division of motor vehicles shall
be funded by general revenue appropriations.
(g) The director of the department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory is
empowered to make and file with the secretary of state regulations that prescribe the techniques
and methods of chemical analysis of the person’s body fluids or breath and the qualifications and
certification of individuals authorized to administer this testing and analysis.
(h) Jurisdiction for misdemeanor violations of this section shall be with the district court
for persons eighteen (18) years of age or older and to the family court for persons under the age of
eighteen (18) years. The courts shall have full authority to impose any sentence authorized and to
order the suspension of any license for violations of this section. Trials in superior court are not
required to be scheduled within thirty (30) days of the arraignment date.
LC002635 - Page 25 of 36

(i) No fines, suspensions, assessments, alcohol or drug treatment programs, course on
driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance, public community
restitution, or jail provided for under this section can be suspended.
(j) An order to attend a special course on driving while intoxicated, that shall be
administered in cooperation with a college or university accredited by the state, shall include a
provision to pay a reasonable tuition for the course in an amount not less than twenty-five dollars
($25.00), and a fee of one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175), which fee shall be deposited into
the general fund.
(k) For the purposes of this section, any test of a sample of blood, breath, or urine for the
presence of alcohol that relies in whole or in part upon the principle of infrared light absorption is
considered a chemical test.
(l) If any provision of this section, or the application of any provision, shall for any reason
be judged invalid, such a judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of the
section, but shall be confined in this effect to the provision or application directly involved in the
controversy giving rise to the judgment.
(m) For the purposes of this section, “servicemember” means a person who is presently
serving in the armed forces of the United States, including the Coast Guard, a reserve component
thereof, or the National Guard. “Veteran” means a person who has served in the armed forces,
including the Coast Guard of the United States, a reserve component thereof, or the National Guard,
and has been discharged under other than dishonorable conditions.
31-27-2.1. Refusal to submit to chemical test. [Effective July 1, 2025.]
(a) Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state shall be deemed to have
given his or her consent to chemical tests of his or her breath, blood, saliva and/or urine for the
purpose of determining the chemical content of his or her body fluids or breath. No more than two
(2) complete tests, one for the presence of intoxicating liquor and one for the presence of toluene
or any controlled substance, as defined in § 21-28-1.02, shall be administered at the direction of a
law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person to have been driving a
motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any
controlled substance, as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination of these. The director
of the department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory is empowered to make and file,
with the secretary of state, regulations that prescribe the techniques and methods of chemical
analysis of the person’s body fluids or breath and the qualifications and certification of individuals
authorized to administer the testing and analysis.
(b) If a person, for religious or medical reasons, cannot be subjected to blood tests, the
LC002635 - Page 26 of 36

person may file an affidavit with the division of motor vehicles stating the reasons why he or she
cannot be required to take blood tests and a notation to this effect shall be made on his or her
license. If that person is asked to submit to chemical tests as provided under this chapter, the person
shall only be required to submit to chemical tests of his or her breath, saliva or urine. When a person
is requested to submit to blood tests, only a physician or registered nurse, or a medical technician
certified under regulations promulgated by the director of the department of health Rhode Island
state crime laboratory, may withdraw blood for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content in
it. This limitation shall not apply to the taking of breath, saliva or urine specimens. The person
tested shall be permitted to have a physician of his or her own choosing, and at his or her own
expense, administer chemical tests of his or her breath, blood, saliva and/or urine in addition to the
tests administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer. If a person, having been placed
under arrest, refuses upon the request of a law enforcement officer to submit to the tests, as provided
in § 31-27-2, none shall be given.
(1) At the initial traffic tribunal appearance, the magistrate shall review the incident, action,
and/or arrest reports submitted by the law enforcement officer to determine if there exists
reasonable grounds to believe that the person had been driving a motor vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of
title 21, or any combination thereof. The magistrate shall also determine if the person had been
informed of the penalties incurred as a result of failing to submit to a chemical test as provided in
this section and that the person had been informed of the implied consent notice contained in
subsection (c)(10) of this section. For the purpose of this subsection only, “driving a motor vehicle
while under the influence of any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21” shall be
indicated by the presence or aroma of a controlled substance on or about the person or vehicle of
the individual refusing the chemical test or other reliable indicia or articulable conditions that the
person was impaired due to their intake of a controlled substance.
(2) If the magistrate determines that subsection (b)(1) of this section has been satisfied they
shall promptly order that the person’s operator’s license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in
this state be immediately suspended. Said suspension shall be subject to the hardship provisions
enumerated in § 31-27-2.8.
(c) A traffic tribunal judge or magistrate, or a district court judge or magistrate, pursuant
to the terms of subsection (d) of this section, shall order as follows:
(1) Impose, for the first violation, a fine in the amount of two hundred dollars ($200) to
five hundred dollars ($500) and shall order the person to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of
public community restitution. The person’s driving license in this state shall be suspended for a
LC002635 - Page 27 of 36

period of six (6) months to one year. The traffic tribunal judge or magistrate shall require attendance
at a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance
and/or alcohol or drug treatment for the individual. The traffic tribunal judge or magistrate may
prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock
system and/or blood and urine testing as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(2) Every person convicted of a second violation within a ten-year (10) period, except with
respect to cases of refusal to submit to a blood test, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; shall be
imprisoned for not more than six (6) months; shall pay a fine in the amount of six hundred dollars
($600) to one thousand dollars ($1,000); perform sixty (60) to one hundred (100) hours of public
community restitution; and the person’s driving license in this state shall be suspended for a period
of one year to two (2) years. The judge or magistrate shall require alcohol and/or drug treatment
for the individual. The sentencing judge or magistrate shall prohibit that person from operating a
motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing
as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(3) Every person convicted for a third or subsequent violation within a ten-year (10) period,
except with respect to cases of refusal to submit to a blood test, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor;
and shall be imprisoned for not more than one year; fined eight hundred dollars ($800) to one
thousand dollars ($1,000); shall perform not less than one hundred (100) hours of public community
restitution; and the person’s operator’s license in this state shall be suspended for a period of two
(2) years to five (5) years. The sentencing judge or magistrate shall prohibit that person from
operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and
urine testing as provided in § 31-27-2.8. The judge or magistrate shall require alcohol or drug
treatment for the individual. Provided, that prior to the reinstatement of a license to a person charged
with a third or subsequent violation within a three-year (3) period, a hearing shall be held before a
judge or magistrate. At the hearing, the judge or magistrate shall review the person’s driving record,
his or her employment history, family background, and any other pertinent factors that would
indicate that the person has demonstrated behavior that warrants the reinstatement of his or her
license.
(4) For a second violation within a ten-year (10) period with respect to a case of a refusal
to submit to a blood test, a fine in the amount of six hundred dollars ($600) to one thousand dollars
($1,000); the person shall perform sixty (60) to one hundred (100) hours of public community
restitution; and the person’s driving license in this state shall be suspended for a period of two (2)
years. The judicial officer shall require alcohol and/or drug treatment for the individual. The
sentencing judicial officer shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle that is not
LC002635 - Page 28 of 36

equipped with an ignition interlock system as provided in § 31-27-2.8. Such a violation with respect
to refusal to submit to a chemical blood test shall be a civil offense.
(5) For a third or subsequent violation within a ten-year (10) period with respect to a case
of a refusal to submit to a blood test, a fine in the amount of eight hundred dollars ($800) to one
thousand dollars ($1,000); the person shall perform not less than one hundred (100) hours of public
community restitution; and the person’s driving license in this state shall be suspended for a period
of two (2) to five (5) years. The sentencing judicial officer shall prohibit that person from operating
a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
The judicial officer shall require alcohol and/or drug treatment for the individual. Such a violation
with respect to refusal to submit to a chemical test of blood shall be a civil offense. Provided, that
prior to the reinstatement of a license to a person charged with a third or subsequent violation within
a three-year (3) period, a hearing shall be held before a judicial officer. At the hearing, the judicial
officer shall review the person’s driving record, his or her employment history, family background,
and any other pertinent factors that would indicate that the person has demonstrated behavior that
warrants the reinstatement of their license.
(6) For purposes of determining the period of license suspension, a prior violation shall
constitute any charge brought and sustained under the provisions of this section or § 31-27-2.
(7) In addition to any other fines, a highway safety assessment of five hundred dollars
($500) shall be paid by any person found in violation of this section, the assessment to be deposited
into the general fund. The assessment provided for by this subsection shall be collected from a
violator before any other fines authorized by this section.
(8) In addition to any other fines and highway safety assessments, a two-hundred-dollar
($200) assessment shall be paid by any person found in violation of this section to support the
department of health's Rhode Island state crime laboratory's chemical testing programs outlined in
§§ 31-27-2(f) and 31-27-2(g), that shall be deposited as general revenues, not restricted receipts.
(9) No fines, suspensions, assessments, alcohol or drug treatment programs, course on
driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance, or public community
restitution provided for under this section can be suspended.
(10) Implied consent notice for persons eighteen (18) years of age or older: “Rhode Island
law requires you to submit to a chemical test of your blood, breath, saliva, or urine for the purpose
of determining the chemical content of your body fluids or breath. If you refuse this testing, certain
penalties can be imposed and include the following: for a first offense, your Rhode Island driver’s
license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state can be suspended for six (6) months to
one year or modified to permit operation in connection with an ignition interlock device and/or
LC002635 - Page 29 of 36

blood and urine testing for a period specified by law; a fine from two hundred dollars ($200) to five
hundred dollars ($500) can be imposed; and you can be ordered to perform ten (10) to sixty (60)
hours of community service and attend a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the
influence of a controlled substance and/or alcohol or drug treatment. If you have had one or more
previous offenses within the past ten (10) years, your refusal to submit to a chemical test of breath
or urine at this time can have criminal penalties, including incarceration up to six (6) months for a
second offense and up to one year for a third or subsequent offense, and can carry increased license
suspension or ignition interlock and/or blood and urine testing periods, fines, and community
service. All violators shall pay a five hundred dollar ($500) highway safety assessment fee, a two
hundred dollar ($200) department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory chemical testing
programs assessment fee, and a license reinstatement fee. Refusal to submit to a chemical test of
blood shall not subject you to criminal penalties for the refusal itself, but if you have one or more
previous offenses other civil penalties may increase. You have the right to be examined at your
own expense by a physician selected by you. If you submit to a chemical test at this time, you have
the right to have an additional chemical test performed at your own expense. You will be afforded
a reasonable opportunity to exercise these rights. Access to a telephone will be made available for
you to make those arrangements. You may now use a telephone.”
Use of this implied consent notice shall serve as evidence that a person’s consent to a
chemical test is valid in a prosecution involving driving under the influence of liquor, controlled
substances, and/or drugs.
(d) Upon suspending or refusing to issue a license or permit as provided in subsection (a),
the traffic tribunal or district court shall immediately notify the person involved in writing, and
upon his or her request, within fifteen (15) days, afford the person an opportunity for a hearing as
early as practical upon receipt of a request in writing. Upon a hearing, the judge may administer
oaths and may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant books
and papers. If the judge finds after the hearing that:
(1) The law enforcement officer making the sworn report had reasonable grounds to believe
that the arrested person had been driving a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance, as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or
any combination of these;
(2) The person, while under arrest, refused to submit to the tests upon the request of a law
enforcement officer;
(3) The person had been informed of his or her rights in accordance with § 31-27-3; and
(4) The person had been informed of the penalties contained in the implied consent notice
LC002635 - Page 30 of 36

set forth in subsection (c)(10) of this section, the judge shall sustain the violation. The judge shall
then impose the penalties set forth in subsection (c) of this section. Action by the judge must be
taken within seven (7) days after the hearing or it shall be presumed that the judge has refused to
issue his or her order of suspension.
(e) For the purposes of this section, any test of a sample of blood, breath, or urine for the
presence of alcohol that relies, in whole or in part, upon the principle of infrared light absorption is
considered a chemical test.
(f) If any provision of this section, or the application of any provision, shall, for any reason,
be judged invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of the section,
but shall be confined in this effect to the provisions or application directly involved in the
controversy giving rise to the judgment.
31-27-2.3. Revocation of license upon refusal to submit to preliminary breath test.
(a) When a law enforcement officer has reason to believe that a person is driving or in
actual physical control of any motor vehicle in this state while under the influence of alcohol, the
law enforcement officer may require the person to submit to a preliminary breath analysis for the
purpose of determining the person’s blood alcohol content. The breath analysis must be
administered immediately upon the law enforcement officer’s formulation of a reasonable belief
that the person is driving or in actual control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol,
or immediately upon the stop of the person, whichever is later in time. Any chemical breath analysis
required under this section must be administered with a device and in a manner approved by the
director of the department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory for that purpose. The result
of a preliminary chemical breath analysis may be used for the purpose of guiding the officer in
deciding whether an arrest should be made. When a driver is arrested following a preliminary breath
analysis, tests may be taken pursuant to § 31-27-2.1. The results of a preliminary breath test may
not be used as evidence in any administrative or court proceeding involving driving while
intoxicated or refusing to take a breathalyzer test, except as evidence of probable cause in making
the initial arrest.
(b) If a person refuses, upon a lawful request of a law enforcement officer, to submit to a
test under subsection (a) of this section, that person shall be guilty of an infraction and shall be
subject to the penalty provided in § 31-41.1-4. However, it shall be a defense to a charge of refusing
a validly requested preliminary breath analysis that the medical condition of a person precluded the
giving of any such test.
31-27-2.5. Chemical tests to persons under eighteen (18) years of age — Refusal —
License suspension.
LC002635 - Page 31 of 36

(a) Any person under eighteen (18) years of age who shall refuse to submit to a chemical
test as provided in § 31-27-2 shall have imposed all the penalties provided by § 31-27-2.1, but shall
have his or her license suspended on a first violation for six (6) months, subject to the terms of
subsection (e) of this section.
(b) Jurisdiction for violations of this section is given to the family court.
(c) If a person as set forth in subsection (a) of this section refuses, upon the request of a
law enforcement officer, to submit to a test as provided in § 31-27-2.1, none shall be given, but a
judge of the family court, upon receipt of a report or testimony of a law enforcement officer: that
he or she had probable cause to stop the arrested person and reasonable grounds to believe the
arrested person had been driving a motor vehicle within this state while impaired by intoxicating
liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance, as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination
of these; that the person had been informed of his or her rights in accordance with § 31-27-3; that
the person had been informed of the implied consent notice contained in subsection (h) of this
section; and that the person had refused to submit to the test upon the request of a law enforcement
officer; shall promptly order a hearing on whether the person’s operator’s license or privilege to
operate a motor vehicle in this state shall be suspended. Upon suspension, the judge shall order the
license of the person to be surrendered to the department of administration, division of motor
vehicles, within three (3) days.
(d) If the person takes a test, as provided in § 31-27-2 and the test determines the person’s
blood alcohol concentration to be at least two-hundredths of one percent (.02%) but less than one-
tenth of one percent (.1%) by weight, the person shall be determined to have been driving while
impaired. A judge of the family court shall, pursuant to the terms of subsection (e) of this section,
order as follows:
(1) A highway safety assessment of one hundred fifty dollars ($150), or community
restitution in lieu of highway safety assessment shall be paid by any person found in violation of
this section. The assessment shall be deposited into the general fund.
(2) The person’s driving license shall be suspended for six (6) months on a first violation,
and may be suspended for a period of up to twelve (12) months, provided the person also shall
attend a special course on driving while intoxicated and provided that the person shall also attend
an alcohol and/or drug treatment program if ordered by the family court judge. Failure or refusal
of the person to attend the course and/or alcohol or drug treatment program shall result in the
person’s driving license being suspended until the course or treatment program has been completed.
(3) On a second violation of this section, the person’s driving license shall be suspended
until he or she is twenty-one (21) years of age. The sentencing judge shall require alcohol and/or
LC002635 - Page 32 of 36

drug treatment for the individual.
(4) On a third or subsequent violation, the person’s driving license shall be suspended for
an additional period of two (2) years and the sentencing judge shall require alcohol and/or drug
treatment for the individual.
(5) No suspensions, assessments, driving while intoxicated school, or alcohol and/or drug
treatment programs under this section can be suspended, shortened, altered, or changed.
(e) Upon suspending a license or permit as provided in subsection (a), (c), or (d) of this
section, the family court shall immediately notify the person involved, in writing, as well as the
custodial parent if the person is under the age of eighteen (18) years.
(f) The police department which charges any person under eighteen (18) years of age with
refusal to submit to a chemical test, driving while impaired by intoxicating liquors or drugs, or
driving while under the influence of liquor or drugs, shall ascertain the name and address of the
custodial parent of the person and shall notify the parent in writing within ten (10) days of the
charge.
(g) The department of administration, upon issuing a first license to a person sixteen (16)
or seventeen (17) years of age, shall provide a written notice of the penalties provided by this
section. Any violation of this section shall not be considered a criminal offense.
(h) Implied consent notice for persons under eighteen (18) years of age:
“Rhode Island law requires you to submit to a chemical test of your blood, breath, or urine
for the purpose of determining the chemical content of your body fluids or breath. If you refuse this
testing, certain penalties can be imposed. These penalties include the following: your Rhode Island
driver’s license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state can be suspended for six (6)
months or modified to permit operation in connection with an ignition interlock device for a period
specified by law; a fine from two hundred dollars ($200) to five hundred dollars ($500) can be
imposed; and you can be ordered to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of community service and
attend a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance
and/or alcohol or drug treatment. If you have had one or more previous offenses within the past
five (5) years, your loss or modification of license, fine, and community service sanctions can
increase over those provided for a first offense. All violators shall pay a five hundred dollar ($500)
highway safety assessment fee, a two hundred dollar ($200) department of health Rhode Island
state crime laboratory chemical testing programs fee, and a license reinstatement fee. If you refuse
to submit to a chemical test, you will be required to maintain proof of financial responsibility for
three (3) years. Refusal to submit to a chemical test shall not be considered a criminal offense. You
have the right to be examined at your own expense by a physician selected by you. If you submit
LC002635 - Page 33 of 36

to a chemical test at this time, you have the right to have an additional chemical test performed at
your own expense. You will be afforded a reasonable opportunity to exercise these rights. Access
to a telephone will be made available for you to make those arrangements. You may now use the
telephone.”
Use of this implied consent notice shall serve as evidence that a person’s consent to a
chemical test is valid in a trial for driving under the influence of liquor, controlled substances,
and/or drugs.
31-27-2.9. Administration of chemical test.
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of § 31-27-2.1, if an individual refuses to consent to a
chemical test as provided in § 31-27-2.1, and a peace officer, as defined in § 12-7-21, has probable
cause to believe that the individual has violated one or more of the following sections: 31-27-1, 31-
27-1.1, 31-27-2.2, or 31-27-2.6 and that the individual was operating a motor vehicle under the
influence of any intoxicating liquor, toluene or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 21-
28, or any combination thereof, a chemical test may be administered without the consent of that
individual provided that the peace officer first obtains a search warrant authorizing administration
of the chemical test. The chemical test shall determine the amount of the alcohol or the presence of
a controlled substance in that person’s blood, saliva or breath.
(b) The chemical test shall be administered in accordance with the methods approved by
the director of the department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory as provided for in
subdivision 31-27-2(c)(4). The individual shall be afforded the opportunity to have an additional
chemical test as established in subdivision 31-27-2(c)(6).
(c) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, including, but not limited to, chapter 5-
37.3, any health care provider who, as authorized by the search warrant in subsection (a):
(i) Takes a blood, saliva or breath sample from an individual; or
(ii) Performs the chemical test; or
(iii) Provides information to a peace officer pursuant to subsection (a) above and who uses
reasonable care and accepted medical practices shall not be liable in any civil or criminal
proceeding arising from the taking of the sample, from the performance of the chemical test or from
the disclosure or release of the test results.
(d) The results of a chemical test performed pursuant to this section shall be admissible as
competent evidence in any civil or criminal prosecution provided that evidence is presented in
compliance with the conditions set forth in subdivisions 31-27-2(c)(3), 31-27-2(c)(4) and 31-27-
2(c)(6).
(e) All chemical tests administered pursuant to this section shall be audio and video
LC002635 - Page 34 of 36

recorded by the law enforcement agency which applied for and was granted the search warrant
authorizing the administration of the chemical test.
SECTION 8. Section 21-28-4.21 of the General Laws in Chapter 21-28 entitled "Uniform
Controlled Substances Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
21-28-4.21. Drug testing required.
Every person who shall be placed on probation for a violation of any section in this chapter
prohibiting the unlawful sale, distribution, manufacture, delivery or possession with intent to
manufacture, sell, distribute or deliver any controlled substance as classified in schedule I or II or
possession of a controlled substance as classified in schedule I or II shall, as a condition of the
probation, be required to at his or her own expense submit to drug testing in accordance with the
standards and procedures of the department of health Rhode Island state crime laboratory not less
than once per month.
SECTION 9. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002635
========
LC002635 - Page 35 of 36